Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0615.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12501. (1) As used in sections 12501 to 12516: (a) "Campground" means a parcel or tract of land under the control of a person in which sites are offered for the use of the public or members of an organization, either free of charge or for a fee, for the establishment of temporary living quarters for 5 or more recreational units. Campground does not include a seasonal mobile home park licensed under the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301 to 125.2349.125.2350. (b) "Department" means the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (c) "Local health department" means that term as defined under section 1105. (d) "Local unit of government" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan planning enabling act, 2008 PA 33, MCL 125.3803. (e) "Master plan" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan planning enabling act, 2008 PA 33, MCL 125.3803. (f) (d) "Mobile home" means a structure, transportable in 1 or more sections, which is built on a chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without permanent foundation, when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems contained in the structure. (g) (e) "Person" means a person as defined in section 1106 or a governmental entity. (h) (f) "Recreational unit" means a tent or vehicular-type structure, primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle which is self-powered. A tent means a collapsible shelter of canvas or other fabric stretched and sustained by poles and used for camping outdoors. Recreational unit includes the following: (i) A travel trailer, which is a vehicular portable structure, mounted on wheels, of such a size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when drawn by a vehicle, primarily designed and constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. (ii) A camping trailer, which is a vehicular portable structure mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial sidewalls of fabric, plastic, or other pliable material which that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. (iii) A motor home, which is a vehicular structure built on a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis, primarily designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. (iv) A truck camper, which is a portable structure designed to be loaded onto, or affixed to, the bed or chassis of a truck, constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. Truck campers are of 2 basic types: (A) A slide-in camper, which is a portable structure designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck, constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. (B) A chassis-mount camper, which is a portable structure designed to be affixed to a truck chassis, and constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. (v) A single sectional mobile home used only to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. Recreational unit does not include a mobile home used as a permanent dwelling, residence, or living quarters. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 12510a. An individual that resides at a campground is considered temporary for any duration if the campground is located within 50 miles of a local unit of government where 1 of the following applies: (a) Within the previous year, the governor has declared a state of emergency in that local unit of government under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. (b) The master plan adopted by the local unit of government identifies a housing shortage in that local unit of government. (c) The local unit of government has adopted an ordinance or resolution stating that there is a shortage of workers, including, but not limited to, workers in the following industries in the local unit of government: (i) Health care. (ii) Agriculture. (iii) Construction. (iv) Utilities. (v) Hospitality. (vi) Manufacturing. (d) A local unit of government, this state, or a federal agency has identified, through a plan, study, declaration, resolution, or other official report, that there is an insufficient supply of affordable housing in the county in which the campground is located. (e) Data published by the United States Census Bureau, the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or the Michigan state housing development authority finds that either of the following applies in the county where the campground is located: (i) The rental vacancy rate is below 5%. (ii) The median gross rent exceeds 30% of the median household income.